Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 46 Waters

11-46-1.
Boats required to have underwater exhaust.

It shall be unlawful to use a boat propelled in whole or in part by gas, gasoline, naphtha, or other explosive material unless the engine operated by the gas, gasoline, naphtha, or other explosive material is provided with an underwater exhaust or a muffler.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 593, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 119, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 602, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

11-46-1

.

11-46-2.
Penalty for violations.

Any person operating or causing to be operated upon the public waters of this state a boat in violation of the provisions of §

11-46-1

shall be punished by a fine of not less than five dollars ($5.00) nor more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1910, ch. 593, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 119, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 602, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

11-46-2

.

11-46-3.
Power boats on Spring Lake.

It shall be unlawful to use fuel powered motor boats, with the exception of emergency boats, on Spring Lake in the town of Burrillville.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 189.

11-46-4.
Enforcement.

Enforcement of §

11-46-3

shall be within the jurisdiction of the director of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 189, § 1.